dev/apertium-far.far.dix
  <pardef n="esm__n">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ها</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ین</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ات</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ای</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l><b/>من</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>ام</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l><b/>ام</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یم</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>ت</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l><b/>تو</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ات</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l><b/>ات</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یت</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>ش</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l><b/>او</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>اش</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l><b/>اش</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یش</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>مان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l><b/>ما</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یمان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>تان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
	 	<e><p><l><b/>شما</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یتان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>

	
	    <e><p><l>شان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
	 	<e><p><l><b/>آن‌ها</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یشان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>

	
		<e><p><l>هایی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	 	<e><p><l>انی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	 	<e><p><l>ینی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>اتی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  	
		<e><p><l>هایی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
	 	<e><p><l>انی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>اتی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
	 	<e><p><l>ینی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>هایم</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>هایت</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>هایش</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>هایمان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>هایتان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>هایشان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>های<b/>من</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>های<b/>تو</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>های<b/>او</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>های<b/>ما</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>های<b/>شما</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>های<b/>آن‌ها</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>انم</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>انت</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>انش</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>انمان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>	  
		<e><p><l>انتان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>انشان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>ان<b/>من</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ان<b/>تو</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ان<b/>او</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ان<b/>ما</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ان<b/>شما</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ان<b/>آن‌ها</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>ینم</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ینت</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ینش</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>	
		<e><p><l>ینمان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>	
		<e><p><l>ینتان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>	
		<e><p><l>ینشان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>ین<b/>من</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ین<b/>تو</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ین<b/>او</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ین<b/>ما</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>

	<e lm="کوه"><i>کوه</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="طرح"><i>طرح</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="روز"><i>روز</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="خلیج"><i>خلیج</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="رتبه"><i>رتبه</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="عارضه"><i>عارضه</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="پرسپولیس"><i>پرسپولیس</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="رقیب"><i>رقیب</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="مراد"><i>مراد</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="غروب"><i>غروب</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="لرزه"><i>لرزه</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="هفته‌نامه"><i>هفته‌نامه</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="خطابه"><i>خطابه</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ابتکار"><i>ابتکار</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="درهم‌سازی"><i>درهم‌سازی</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="شباهنگ"><i>شباهنگ</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="روادید"><i>روادید</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ده‌داری"><i>ده‌داری</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="مهاجرت"><i>مهاجرت</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="رماتیسم"><i>رماتیسم</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ظرفیت"><i>ظرفیت</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="جان‌باخته"><i>جان‌باخته</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="حشو"><i>حشو</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="پیراهن"><i>پیراهن</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ریتم"><i>ریتم</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="عرق‌گیر"><i>عرق‌گیر</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="نگارخانه"><i>نگارخانه</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="فرمان"><i>فرمان</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جسارت"><i>جسارت</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تحقق"><i>تحقق</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="انجمن"><i>انجمن</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="زاده"><i>زاده</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="نهضت"><i>نهضت</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گلبرگ"><i>گلبرگ</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پاتک"><i>پاتک</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پیش‌خدمت"><i>پیش‌خدمت</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="عروس"><i>عروس</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تیمار"><i>تیمار</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="محاصره"><i>محاصره</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="انجیل"><i>انجیل</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="وصی"><i>وصی</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="نورسنج"><i>نورسنج</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="لوس‌آنجلس"><i>لوس‌آنجلس</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="جیفه"><i>جیفه</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="مرغه"><i>مراغه</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="فک"><i>فک</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="نماهنگ"><i>نماهنگ</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="پری‌دریایی"><i>پری‌دریایی</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="شایعه"><i>شایعه</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="رقم"><i>رقم</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="مقبره"><i>مقبره</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="بولدزر"><i>بولدزر</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="اندوه"><i>اندوه</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="انحصار"><i>انحصار</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ژلاتینه"><i>ژلاتینه</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="مبارز"><i>مبارز</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ایوان"><i>ایوان</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="کیفیت"><i>کیفیت</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="خمیر"><i>خمیر</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="دست‌شویی"><i>دست‌شویی</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="کلیه"><i>کلیه</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="مبلمان"><i>مبلمان</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="پیمان‌کار"><i>پیمان‌کار</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="گگماشتاری"><i>گگماشتاری</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="باران"><i>باران</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="بارندگی"><i>بارندگی</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="هلال"><i>هلال</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="جوش"><i>جوش</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="سرنیزه"><i>سرنیزه</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="میل‌پرده"><i>میل‌پرده</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="رخ"><i>رخ</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="روزمرگی"><i>روزمرگی</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="عيار"><i>عيار</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="معالجه"><i>معالجه</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="جمجمه"><i>جمجمه</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="دانتس"><i>دانتس</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
	<e lm="هیاهو"><i>هیاهو</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="رقص"><i>رقص</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نیاکان"><i>نیاکان</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کشف"><i>کشف</i><par n="esm__n"/></e>
